data/grammar/fst/endings-generated.lexc
++lunitit+tv-part-3s-2s-fut:VOICElunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3s-2s-fut:VOICElunitit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4s-2s-fut:lutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4s-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4s-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4s-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-fut:lugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2s-3s-fut:lugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:llusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:tusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:tusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:tusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtusi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:llunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:tunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:tunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:tunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtunisi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:llusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:tusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:tusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:tusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-prespas:KGUARDtusi # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:llugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++luniuk+tv-part-3s-3s-fut:luniuk # ;
++luniuk+tv-part-3s-3s-fut:VOICEluniuk # ;
++luniuk+tv-part-3s-3s-fut:VOICEluniuk # ;
++luniuk+tv-part-3s-3s-fut:VOICEluniuk # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4s-3s-fut:lugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4s-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2s-1d-fut:lunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2s-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2s-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2s-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3s-1d-fut:lunitiguk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3s-1d-fut:VOICElunitiguk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3s-1d-fut:VOICElunitiguk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3s-1d-fut:VOICElunitiguk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4s-1d-fut:lunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4s-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4s-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4s-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1s-2d-fut:lutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1s-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1s-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1s-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3s-2d-fut:lunitik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3s-2d-fut:VOICElunitik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3s-2d-fut:VOICElunitik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3s-2d-fut:VOICElunitik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4s-2d-fut:lutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4s-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4s-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4s-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1s-3d-fut:lugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2s-3d-fut:lugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lunigik+tv-part-3s-3d-fut:lunigik # ;
++lunigik+tv-part-3s-3d-fut:VOICElunigik # ;
++lunigik+tv-part-3s-3d-fut:VOICElunigik # ;
++lunigik+tv-part-3s-3d-fut:VOICElunigik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4s-3d-fut:lugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4s-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++luta+tv-part-2s-1p-fut:luta # ;
++luta+tv-part-2s-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++luta+tv-part-2s-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++luta+tv-part-2s-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3s-1p-fut:lunitigut # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3s-1p-fut:VOICElunitigut # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3s-1p-fut:VOICElunitigut # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3s-1p-fut:VOICElunitigut # ;
++luta+tv-part-4s-1p-fut:luta # ;
++luta+tv-part-4s-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++luta+tv-part-4s-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++luta+tv-part-4s-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-fut:lusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-fut:VOICElusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-fut:VOICElusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-1s-2p-fut:VOICElusi # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:llugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:llunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:tunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:tunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:tunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtunigit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:llugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:tugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-prespas:KGUARDtugit # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:llunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:tunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:tunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:tunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtunga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:lluninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:tuninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtuninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:tuninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtuninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:tuninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtuninga # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-fut:lunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-fut:VOICElunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-fut:VOICElunisi # ;
++lunisi+tv-part-3s-2p-fut:VOICElunisi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-fut:lusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-fut:VOICElusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-fut:VOICElusi # ;
++lusi+tv-part-4s-2p-fut:VOICElusi # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-fut:lugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-1s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-fut:lugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-2s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-fut:lunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-fut:VOICElunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-fut:VOICElunigit # ;
++lunigit+tv-part-3s-3p-fut:VOICElunigit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-fut:lugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lugit+tv-part-4s-3p-fut:VOICElugit # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-fut:lunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-fut:VOICElunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-fut:VOICElunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-2d-1s-fut:VOICElunga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-fut:luninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-fut:VOICEluninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-fut:VOICEluninga # ;
++luninga+tv-part-3d-1s-fut:VOICEluninga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-fut:lunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-fut:VOICElunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-fut:VOICElunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-fut:VOICElunga # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-fut:lutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-fut:lunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-fut:VOICElunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-fut:VOICElunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-fut:VOICElunitit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-fut:lutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-fut:VOICElutit # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-fut:lugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2d-3s-fut:lugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-2d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lunikku+tv-part-3d-3s-fut:lunikku # ;
++lunikku+tv-part-3d-3s-fut:VOICElunikku # ;
++lunikku+tv-part-3d-3s-fut:VOICElunikku # ;
++lunikku+tv-part-3d-3s-fut:VOICElunikku # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4d-3s-fut:lugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-4d-3s-fut:VOICElugu # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:llunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:tunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:tunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:tunga # ;
++lunga+tv-part-4d-1s-prespas:KGUARDtunga # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:llutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:tutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:tutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:tutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-1d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtutit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:llunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:tunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:tunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:tunitit # ;
++lunitit+tv-part-3d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtunitit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:llutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:tutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:tutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:tutit # ;
++lutit+tv-part-4d-2s-prespas:KGUARDtutit # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:llugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:tugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:KGUARDtugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:tugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:KGUARDtugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:tugu # ;
++lugu+tv-part-1d-3s-prespas:KGUARDtugu # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2d-1d-fut:lunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2d-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2d-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-2d-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3d-1d-fut:lunitiguk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3d-1d-fut:VOICElunitiguk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3d-1d-fut:VOICElunitiguk # ;
++lunitiguk+tv-part-3d-1d-fut:VOICElunitiguk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4d-1d-fut:lunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4d-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4d-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lunuk+tv-part-4d-1d-fut:VOICElunuk # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1d-2d-fut:lutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1d-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1d-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-1d-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3d-2d-fut:lunitik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3d-2d-fut:VOICElunitik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3d-2d-fut:VOICElunitik # ;
++lunitik+tv-part-3d-2d-fut:VOICElunitik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4d-2d-fut:lutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4d-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4d-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lutik+tv-part-4d-2d-fut:VOICElutik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1d-3d-fut:lugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-1d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2d-3d-fut:lugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-2d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lunikkik+tv-part-3d-3d-fut:lunikkik # ;
++lunikkik+tv-part-3d-3d-fut:VOICElunikkik # ;
++lunikkik+tv-part-3d-3d-fut:VOICElunikkik # ;
++lunikkik+tv-part-3d-3d-fut:VOICElunikkik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4d-3d-fut:lugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++lugik+tv-part-4d-3d-fut:VOICElugik # ;
++luta+tv-part-2d-1p-fut:luta # ;
++luta+tv-part-2d-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++luta+tv-part-2d-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++luta+tv-part-2d-1p-fut:VOICEluta # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3d-1p-fut:lunitigut # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3d-1p-fut:VOICElunitigut # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3d-1p-fut:VOICElunitigut # ;
++lunitigut+tv-part-3d-1p-fut:VOICElunitigut # ;
